Illinois, session 104th, SB2395.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Residential Automated Solar Permitting Platform Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Baseline residential code" means an edition of the 8International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family 9Dwellings first published by the International Code Council 10during the current year or preceding 9 calendar years 11excluding Parts IV and VII.12    "Residential automated solar permitting platform" means 13software or a combination of software that automates plan 14review, automatically produces code-compliant approvals, 15accepts online payments for permitting fees if permitting fees 16are levied, and instantly issues permits and permit revisions 17for residential photovoltaic systems upon online submission of 18permitting fee payments, if permitting fees are levied, and a 19code-compliant application. The residential automated solar 20permitting platform shall be available for residential 21photovoltaic systems up to the maximum capacity allowed with a 22200-amp main service disconnect and installed to the 23requirements of the baseline residential code that may include   SB2395- 2 -LRB104 10247 JRC 20321 b1an energy storage system up to the maximum capacity allowed 2under the baseline residential code, a main panel upgrade, or 3a main breaker derate. 4    Section 10. Adoption of platform. On or before July 1, 52026, municipalities with a population of more than 5,000 6residents and all counties shall adopt a residential automated 7solar permitting platform. The municipality or county shall 8anticipate that the residential automated solar permitting 9platform will have the capability to process at least 75% of 10residential solar applications on existing construction 11submitted to authorities having jurisdiction in the State.12    For a solar photovoltaic system approved by such a 13platform under this Section, municipalities and counties may 14not require manual review at any time during the permitting 15and inspection processes, including, but not limited to, 16before issuing a permit or before conducting or finalizing the 17inspection. This does not preclude an inspector from examining 18construction documents. 19    Section 15. Reporting.20    (a) On or before July 1, 2026, municipalities with a 21population of more than 5,000 residents and all counties shall 22include on their websites the availability of a residential 23automated solar permitting platform and how to access it.24    (b) Municipalities and counties shall publish compliance   SB2395- 3 -LRB104 10247 JRC 20321 b1reports to their official website when the municipality or 2county is in compliance with Section 10. The reports shall be 3published within 60 days of the municipality or county 4becoming compliant with Section 10. The reports shall include 5the following:6        (1) the date of compliance;7        (2) the software used for compliance;8        (3) confirmation that the municipality or county is:9            (A) using a residential automated solar permitting 10        platform to issue permits instantly and issue permit 11        revisions instantly for residential solar photovoltaic 12        systems; and13            (B) not requiring manual review at any time during 14        the permitting and inspection processes, including, 15        but not limited to, before issuing a permit or before 16        conducting or finalizing the inspection for solar 17        photovoltaic systems approved by the residential 18        automated solar permitting platform; and19        (4) an explanation as to why the municipality or 20    county anticipates the residential automated solar 21    permitting platform has the capability to process at least 22    75% of the residential solar photovoltaic permit 23    applications on existing construction submitted to 24    municipalities and counties in the State. Municipalities 25    and counties may provide explanations that are based on, 26    but are not necessarily limited to, statements from the   SB2395- 4 -LRB104 10247 JRC 20321 b1    provider of the residential automated solar permitting 2    platform.3    (c) Municipalities and counties of more than 5,000 4residents and all counties shall publish annual reports on 5their website on the usage of the residential automated solar 6permitting platform. A municipality and county shall publish 7the report annually by April 1st each year, covering the 8previous calendar year, starting on April 1, 2027. This annual 9reporting requirement shall become inoperative on April 2, 102036. The reports shall include the following:11        (1) the number of permits issued through the 12    residential automated solar permitting platform and 13    relevant characteristics of those systems;14        (2) the number of residential photovoltaic solar 15    permits issued by means other than the residential 16    automated solar permitting platform and relevant 17    characteristics of those systems;18        (3) the software used for compliance; and19        (4) confirmation that the municipality or county is:20            (A) using a residential automated solar permitting 21        platform to issue permits instantly and issue permit 22        revisions instantly for residential solar photovoltaic 23        systems;24            (B) not requiring manual review at any time during 25        the permitting and inspection processes, including, 26        but not limited to, before issuing a permit or before   SB2395- 5 -LRB104 10247 JRC 20321 b1        conducting or finalizing the inspection for permits 2        and permit revisions issued by the residential 3        automated solar permitting platform; and4            (C) plan to increase usage of the residential 5        automated solar permitting platform if fewer than 75% 6        of residential solar photovoltaic permits are issued 7        through the automated permitting platform on existing 8        construction. 9    Section 20. Remedies.10    (a) A person or entity aggrieved by a violation of this Act 11or any rule adopted under this Act by a municipality or county 12may file a civil action in the county in which the alleged 13offense occurred or where any person who is party to the action 14resides, without regard to exhaustion of any alternative 15administrative remedies provided in this Act. Actions may be 16brought by one or more persons or entities for and on behalf of 17themselves and other persons similarly situated. A person or 18entity whose rights have been violated under this Act by a 19municipality or county is entitled to collect:20        (1) up to 50% of the total cost of the residential 21    photovoltaic system installation for which the permit is 22    requested;23        (2) in the case of unlawful retaliation, all legal or 24    equitable relief as may be appropriate; and25        (3) attorney's fees and costs.  SB2395- 6 -LRB104 10247 JRC 20321 b1    (b) The right of an interested party or aggrieved person 2to bring an action under this Act terminates after 3 years from 3the date that a person or entity requested a permit for a 4residential photovoltaic system. This limitation period is 5tolled if a municipality or county has deterred a person's 6exercise of rights under this Act. 7    Section 25. Local ordinances. Beginning July 1, 2026, any 8municipal building code or county building code must regulate 9photovoltaic systems and stationary storage battery systems in 10one-family and 2-family dwellings in a manner that is at least 11as stringent as the baseline residential code. 12    Section 30. Remote inspections. On or before July 1 2026, 13municipalities with a population of more than 5,000 residents 14and all counties shall provide an option for remote 15inspections via recorded video or photo that can be submitted 16electronically for projects permitted by the residential 17automated solar permitting platform. These inspections shall 18be offered at no greater cost and shall be available with no 19greater delay than in-person inspections.20        (1) A municipality or county shall require no more 21    than one inspection for projects permitted by the 22    automated solar permitting software unless the first 23    inspection failed.24        (2) A municipality or county that does not require a   SB2395- 7 -LRB104 10247 JRC 20321 b1    permit for residential photovoltaic solar and storage 2    systems is exempt from the requirements in this section.